test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-all_gt-norm.yaml
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitânis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitânis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitânisinân
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitânisinaw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa 
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitânisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitânisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitânisinânak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitânisinawak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâwak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicânisisis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicânisisis
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinân
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinaw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâw
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicânisisisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicânisisisak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinânak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinawak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâwak
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otânisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otânisiyihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitânisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitânisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitânisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otânisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otânisiyihk

     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocânisisisihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicânisisisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicânisisisinâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicânisisisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiwâhk
     otânisimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk

  
  Noun - pahkêkinw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, leather
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg: pahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nipahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kipahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nipahkêkinonân
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kipahkêkinonaw
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kipahkêkinowâw
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: opahkêkin
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: opahkêkinowâw
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: opahkêkinoyiw
     
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl: pahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nipahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kipahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nipahkêkinonâna
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kipahkêkinonawa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kipahkêkinowâwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: opahkêkinwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: opahkêkinowâwa
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: opahkêkinoyiwa
     
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Loc: pahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkêkinonâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kipahkêkinonâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkêkinowâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkêkinohk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkêkinowâhk
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: opahkêkinoyihk
     
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [pahkêkinos, pahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [pahkêkinosa, pahkêkinosisa]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [pahkêkinosihk, pahkêkinosisihk]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nipahkêkinos, nipahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kipahkêkinos, kipahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [opahkêkinos, opahkêkinosis]
     pahkêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: [opahkêkinosiyiw, opahkêkinosisiyiw]

  
  Noun - pahkwêsikan - ok : # -m animate noun, bannock, Grammar guide p. 27
     
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg: pahkwêsikan
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl: pahkwêsikanak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Loc: pahkwêsikanihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Obv: pahkwêsikana
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [pahkwêsikanis, pahkwêsikanisis]
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [pahkwêsikanisak, pahkwêsikanisisak]
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [pahkwêsikanisihk, pahkwêsikanisisihk]

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanim
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanim
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikaniminân
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikaniminaw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimiwâw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanimak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanimak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanima
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikaniminânak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikaniminawak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimiwâwak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanimis
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanimis
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikanimisinân
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisinaw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisiwâw
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nipahkwêsikanimisak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kipahkwêsikanimisak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nipahkwêsikanimisinânak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisinawak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kipahkwêsikanimisiwâwak
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiwâwa
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: opahkwêsikanimisiyiwa

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkwêsikanimihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimiyihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkwêsikaniminâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikaniminâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimiyihk

     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nipahkwêsikanimisihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimisihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisiyihk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nipahkwêsikanimisinâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimisinâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kipahkwêsikanimisiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisiwâhk
     pahkwêsikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: opahkwêsikanimisiyihk

  
  Noun - sihkihp - ok : # -m animate noun, blackbird
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg: sihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl: sihkihpak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Loc: sihkihpihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: sihkihpis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: sihkihpisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: sihkihpisihk

     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpim
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpim
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpima
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpiminân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpiminaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpima
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpiminânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpiminawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimiwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpimisinân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpimisinaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimisiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpimisinânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpimisinawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimisiwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisihkihpimihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisihkihpimihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osihkihpimihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: osihkihpimiyihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisihkihpiminâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisihkihpiminâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisihkihpimiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osihkihpimiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: osihkihpimiyihk

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nisihkihpimisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kisihkihpimisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: osihkihpimisihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: osihkihpimisiyihk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisihkihpimisinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kisihkihpimisinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisihkihpimisiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osihkihpimisiwâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: osihkihpimisiyihk

  
  Noun - sikâk - ok : # -k final animate noun 'goose'
     sikâk+N+AN+Sg: sikâk
     sikâk+N+AN+Pl: sikâkwak
     sikâk+N+AN+Loc: sikâkohk
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: sikâkos
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: sikâkosak
     sikâk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: sikâkosihk
